Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 3. General Provisions.

Sec. 21.75.900.
Definition.

In this chapter,

“material transaction” means a transaction, other than a claim payment, involving more than one-half of one percent of the reciprocal insurer’s admitted assets as of December 31 of the prior year;

“reciprocal insurance” is that resulting from an interexchange among persons, known as “subscribers,” of reciprocal agreements of indemnity, the interexchange being effectuated through an “attorney-in-fact” common to all such persons;

“reciprocal insurer” means an unincorporated aggregation of subscribers operating individually and collectively through an attorney-in-fact to provide reciprocal insurance among themselves.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; § 209 ch 67 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (1) enacted as AS 21.75.345 and renumbered in 1992. Paragraphs (2) and (3) were formerly AS

21.75.280

and

21.75.290

, respectively, and were renumbered in 1992, at which time minor word and punctuation changes were made to reflect the reorganization.